Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1344
State highways; removal of snow and ice; powers and duties.

The department shall keep the highways, except the connecting links, sufficiently clear of snow and ice so as to be reasonably safe for travel. The department shall have the authority to enter upon private and public property adjacent to any highway and place and maintain thereon snow fences wherever it is deemed necessary in order to prevent snow drifting upon the traveled way of the highway. Such snow fences shall be erected in such a manner as to provide the most protection to the highway and shall not be placed on such property prior to October 15, nor remain on such property after April 1, without the consent of the property owner. In case of any damage to such property, the department shall pay the amount of such damage to the owner of the property.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 44, p. 437.